Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201879-2505
Expanded Learning Opportunity Grant Program; priorities.

The first priority of the Expanded Learning Opportunity Grant Program is to continue existing 21st Century Community Learning Centers funded by the federal 21st Century Community Learning Center program pursuant to 20 U.S.C. 7171 et seq., as such sections existed on January 1, 2015, in high-need school districts that have a record of success. The second priority shall be support for new expanded learning opportunity program development in areas of the state with a high percentage of at-risk children that are not currently served by school-based or school-linked expanded learning opportunity programs funded by the federal 21st Century Community Learning Center program pursuant to 20 U.S.C. 7171 et seq., as such sections existed on January 1, 2015.

Laws 2015, LB519, § 19.